Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Administrative Dissolution

§ 17-16-1420.
Grounds for administrative dissolution.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding under W.S.

17-16-1421

to administratively dissolve a corporation if any of the following has occurred:

The corporation does not deliver its annual reports or pay the annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1630

;

Reserved;

The corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this state;

The corporation does not notify the secretary of state within thirty (30) days that its registered agent or registered office has been changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued;

The corporation’s period of duration stated in its articles of incorporation expires;

It is in the public interest and the corporation:

Failed to provide records to the registered agent as required in W.S.

17-28-107

;

Has provided fraudulent information or has failed to correct false information upon request of the secretary of state on any filing under this act with the secretary of state; or

Cannot be served by either the secretary of state or the registered agent at its address provided pursuant to W.S.

17-28-107

.

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the corporation signed a document he knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

The corporation has failed to respond to a valid and enforceable subpoena;

The corporation is in violation of W.S. 17-16-401(d)(v) or 17-16-1506(d)(v);

The corporation has failed to pay any penalties imposed under W.S.

17-28-109

.

Prior to commencing a proceeding under W.S.

17-16-1421

the secretary of state may classify a corporation as delinquent awaiting administrative dissolution if the corporation meets any of the criteria in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2014 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch 90 § 2, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by deleting “for thirty (30) days or more” from the end of (a)(i); and substituting “17-28-107” for “17-16-107” in (a)(v)(A) and (a)(v)(C).

The second 2008 amendment by ch 91 § 2, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by adding (a)(vi), (a)(vii) and (b) and making a related change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(ix).

The 2014 amendment,

in (a)(intro), inserted “any of the following has occurred”; in (a)(viii), deleted “or”; and added (x).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Default judgment where notice served on secretary of state. —

The district court does not err in failing to set aside a default judgment for mistake, inadvertence, surprise or excusable neglect even though the defaulting party, a Wyoming corporation, had no actual notice of the lawsuit, where the plaintiff properly served notice, in accordance with Rule 4(d)(4), W.R.C.P., and the state corporation laws, on the secretary of state when it was determined that the defendant, in violation of the corporation laws, had failed to maintain both a registered office and a registered agent. U.S. Aviation, Inc. v. Wyoming Avionics, Inc., 664 P.2d 121,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 17-16-1421.
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution.

If the secretary of state determines that one (1) or more grounds exist under W.S.

17-16-1420

for dissolving a corporation, he shall serve the corporation with written notice of his determination under W.S.

17-28-104

, except for W.S.

17-16-1420

(a)(v) in which case dissolution is by choice and therefore automatic.

If the corporation does not correct each ground for dissolution or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the secretary of state that each ground determined by the secretary of state does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under W.S.

17-28-104

, the secretary of state shall administratively dissolve the corporation by signing, either manually or in facsimile, a certificate of dissolution that recites the ground or grounds for dissolution and its effective date. The secretary of state shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

.

A corporation administratively dissolved under W.S.

17-16-1420

continues its corporate existence but may not carry on any business except that necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs under W.S.

17-16-1405

and notify claimants under W.S.

17-16-1406

and

17-16-1407

.

The administrative dissolution of a corporation does not terminate the authority of its registered agent.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 91, § 3.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, §§ 2, 3.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-16-504” once in (a) and twice in (b).

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, §§ 2, 3, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by deleting “and W.S. 17-16-1420(a)(iv) in which case notice of the proposed dissolution shall be given only as provided in subsection (e) of this section” at the end of (a); deleting the former last sentence of (b) which read: “The provisions of subsection (e) of this section shall govern the procedures for dissolution pursuant to W.S. 17-16-1420(a)(iv)”; repealing former (e), relating to notice to the corporation of administrative dissolution.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

§ 17-16-1422.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

An officer or other person with proper authority at the time a corporation was administratively dissolved under W.S.

17-16-1421

may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement within two (2) years after the effective date of dissolution. Reinstatement may be denied by the secretary of state if the corporation has been the subject of secretary of state and law enforcement investigation pertaining to fraud or any other violation of state or federal law, or if there is other reason to believe the corporation was engaged in illegal operations. The application shall:

Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not exist or have been eliminated;

Reserved;

If the corporation was administratively dissolved for failing to deliver its annual report or pay the annual license taxes to the secretary of state when due pursuant to W.S.

17-16-1630

, include payment of fees and taxes then delinquent and a reinstatement certificate fee prescribed pursuant to W.S.

17-16-122

; and

If the corporation was administratively dissolved for failure to maintain a registered agent, include payment of a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) reinstatement fee and payment of any fees and taxes then delinquent.

If the secretary of state determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct, he shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites his determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

The corporation shall retain its registered corporate name during the two (2) year reinstatement period.

A person who files any document under this section without proper corporate authority to do so is in violation of W.S.

6-5-308

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 192, § 2; 1999, ch. 196, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 90, § 2; ch. 91, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2010, ch. 60, § 1.

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment by ch. 90, § 2, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-16-504” in (b).

The second 2008 amendment by ch. 91, § 2, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by adding (a)(vi) and made related changes.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “An officer or other person with proper authority at the time a corporation was” for “A corporation” at the beginning of (a); and added (e).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(iv) and (a)(v), substituted “include payment of fees” for “include payment of a sum equal to double the amount of fees,” and made similar changes.

Editor's notes. —

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

Laws 2010, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, provides:

“(a) Notwithstanding
section 1 of this act, if 2010 Senate File 18 is enacted into law,
the amendment of
W.S. 17-15-112(b) in section 1 of this act shall not be effective.

“(b) This section shall
not be effective if 2010 Senate File 18 is not enacted into law.”

§ 17-16-1423.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the secretary of state denies a corporation’s application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution, he shall serve the corporation under W.S.

17-28-104

with a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The corporation may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court within thirty (30) days after service of the notice of denial is perfected. The corporation appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the dissolution and attaching to the petition copies of the secretary of state’s certificate of dissolution, the corporation’s application for reinstatement, and the secretary of state’s notice of denial.

The court may summarily order the secretary of state to reinstate the dissolved corporation or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2008, ch. 90, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amends this section, effective January 1, 2009, by substituting “17-28-104” for “17-16-504” in (a).